Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.060

Conditions of official bond.

The bond of each county commissioner shall be payable to the county, and it shall be conditioned that the commissioner shall well and faithfully discharge the duties of his or her office, and not approve, audit, or order paid any illegal, unwarranted, or unjust claim against the county for personal services.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4064; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.060. Prior: 1955 c 157 s 10; prior: 1921 c 132 s 1, part; 1893 c 75 s 7, part; RRS s 4046, part.]